Missouri, session 2026, HB2091.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 169.596, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 169.596, to read as follows:
169.596. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, a
retired certificated teacher receiving a retirement benefit from the retirement system
established pursuant to sections 169.010 to 169.141 may, without losing his or her retirement
benefit, teach full time for up to four years for a school district covered by such retirement
system; provided that the school district has a shortage of certified teachers, as determined by
the school district, and provided that no such retired certificated teacher shall be employed as
a superintendent. The total number of such retired certificated teachers shall not exceed, at
any one time, the greater of one percent of the total certificated teachers and noncertificated
staff for that school district, or five certificated teachers.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, a person
receiving a retirement benefit from the retirement system established pursuant to sections
169.600 to 169.715 may, without losing his or her retirement benefit, be employed full time
for up to four years for a school district covered by such retirement system; provided that the
school district has a shortage of noncertificated employees, as determined by the school
district. The total number of such retired noncertificated employees shall not exceed, at any
one time, the [lesser of ten] greater of one percent of the total certificated teachers and
noncertificated staff for that school district, or five employees.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2091 2
3. The employer's contribution rate shall be paid by the hiring school district.
4. In order to hire teachers and noncertificated employees pursuant to the provisions
of this section, the school district shall:
(1) Show a good faith effort to fill positions with nonretired certificated teachers or
nonretired noncertificated employees;
(2) Post the vacancy for at least one month;
(3) Have not offered early retirement incentives for either of the previous two years;
(4) Solicit applications through the local newspaper, other media, or teacher
education programs;
(5) Determine there is an insufficient number of eligible applicants for the advertised
position; and
(6) Declare a critical shortage of certificated teachers or noncertificated employees
that is active for one year.
5. Any person hired pursuant to this section shall be included in the State Directory of
New Hires for purposes of income and eligibility verification pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Section
1320b-7.
✔